Massachusetts, session 194th, HD5475.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 12 of chapter 156C of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out Section 12(d) and inserting in place thereof
the following section:-
(d) The fee for the filing of the certificate of organization required by subsection (a) shall
be one hundred and fifty dollars. The fee for the filing of the annual report required by
subsection (c) shall be fifty dollars. Such fees shall be paid to the state secretary at the time the
certificate of organization or the annual report is filed.
SECTION 2. The secretary of the commonwealth shall take all necessary steps to
implement the changes in filing and annual report fees required by this act, including updating
regulations, forms, and filing systems.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect on January 1, 2027.
of 1